District of Columbia statutes.
24-923

Location of BOOT CAMP.

(a)

The Director shall use an existing building or set of buildings, which may be located in the Washington Metropolitan area, to establish a residential center for the BOOT CAMP participants.

(b)

The residential center shall include classrooms, a counseling and vocational training center, separate sleeping accommodations for male and female participants, a dining facility, outdoor drill and recreation areas, and other usages that are necessary for the efficient operation of the BOOT CAMP.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 202, 40 DCR 5768

History

1981 Ed., § 24-823.

Prior Codifications